Wisconsin, session 2025, AB566.
do enact as follows:AB566,11Section 1. 71.07 (5b) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB566,2,5271.07 (5b) (a) 3. “Investment” means a purchase of an equity interest, a 3convertible instrument such as a convertible note or a simple agreement for future 4equity, or any other expenditure, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic 5Development Corporation under s. 238.15.AB566,26Section 2. 71.07 (5d) (a) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB566,2,10771.07 (5d) (a) 1. (intro.) “Bona fide angel investment” means a purchase of an 8equity interest, a convertible instrument such as a convertible note or a simple 9agreement for future equity, or any other expenditure, as determined by rule under 10s. 238.15 or s. 560.205, 2009 stats., that is made by any of the following:AB566,311Section 3. 71.28 (5b) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB566,2,151271.28 (5b) (a) 3. “Investment” means a purchase of an equity interest, a 13convertible instrument such as a convertible note or a simple agreement for future 14equity, or any other expenditure, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic 15Development Corporation under s. 238.15.AB566,416Section 4. 71.47 (5b) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB566,2,201771.47 (5b) (a) 3. “Investment” means a purchase of an equity interest, a 18convertible instrument such as a convertible note or a simple agreement for future 19equity, or any other expenditure, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic 20Development Corporation under s. 238.15.AB566,51Section 5. Initial applicability.AB566,3,22(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning on January 1, 2025.AB566,3,33